Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 6 Registration of Voters
21-2-216.
Qualifications of electors generally; reregistration of electors purged from list; eligibility of nonresidents who vote in presidential elections; retention of qualification for standing as elector; evidence of citizenship; check of convicted felons and deceased persons databases.

No person shall vote in any primary or election held in this state unless such person shall be:

Registered as an elector in the manner prescribed by law;

A citizen of this state and of the United States;

At least 18 years of age on or before the date of the primary or election in which such person seeks to vote;

A resident of this state and of the county or municipality in which he or she seeks to vote; and

Possessed of all other qualifications prescribed by law.

In addition to the qualifications in subsection (a) of this Code section, no person who has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude may register, remain registered, or vote except upon completion of the sentence and no person who has been judicially determined to be mentally incompetent may register, remain registered, or vote unless the disability has been removed.

Any person who possesses the qualifications of an elector except that concerning age shall be permitted to register to vote if such person will acquire such qualification within six months after the day of registration; provided, however, that such person shall not be permitted to vote in a primary or election unless such person shall be at least 18 years of age on or before the date of the primary or election in which such person seeks to vote.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any person who was qualified and registered to vote on June 24, 1964, shall not be required to reregister under the terms of this article unless such person shall have become or becomes disqualified to vote by reason of having been purged from the list of electors or for any other reason whatsoever, in which event such person shall, in order to become registered to vote, reregister under the terms of this article.

If any citizen of this state begins residence in another state after the thirtieth day next preceding any election for President and Vice President and, for that reason, does not satisfy the registration requirements of that state, such citizen shall be allowed to vote for presidential and vice presidential electors, in that election, in person in this state if such citizen satisfied, as of the date of such citizen’s change of residence, the requirements to vote in this state, or by absentee ballot in this state if such citizen satisfies, but for such citizen’s nonresident status and the reason for such citizen’s absence, the requirements for absentee voting in this state.

No person shall remain an elector longer than such person shall retain the qualifications under which such person registered.

On and after January 1, 2010, an application for registration under this chapter shall be accompanied by satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship. Upon the receipt of an application without satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the board of registrars shall notify the applicant in writing of the requirement to provide satisfactory evidence of citizenship. The board of registrars shall not determine the eligibility of the applicant until and unless satisfactory evidence of citizenship is supplied by the applicant. If the initial application is received without satisfactory evidence of citizenship prior to the close of voter registration preceding an election, but the applicant supplies satisfactory evidence of citizenship on or prior to the date of such election and the applicant is found eligible to vote, the applicant shall be permitted to vote in the election and any run-off elections resulting therefrom and subsequent elections; provided, however, that those electors who register to vote for the first time in this state by mail also shall supply current and valid identification as required in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-220. In the event the applicant does not respond to the request for the missing information within 30 days following the sending of notification to provide satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the application shall be rejected.

Satisfactory evidence of citizenship shall include any of the following:

The number of the applicant’s Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Driver Services if the applicant has provided satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship to the Department of Driver Services or a legible photocopy of the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card issued by an equivalent government agency of another state if the agency indicates on the driver’s license or identification card that the applicant has provided satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship to the agency;

A legible photocopy of the applicant’s birth certificate that verifies citizenship to the satisfaction of the board of registrars;

A legible photocopy of pertinent pages of the applicant’s United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant’s passport number or presentation to the board of registrars of the applicant’s United States passport;

A presentation to the board of registrars of a legible copy of the applicant’s United States naturalization documents or the alien registration number from the applicant’s naturalization documents. If only the applicant’s alien registration number is provided, the applicant shall not be found eligible to vote until the applicant’s alien registration number is verified with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services by the board of registrars;

Other documents or methods of proof that are established pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (P. L. 99-603);

The applicant’s Bureau of Indian Affairs card, tribal treaty card, or tribal enrollment card; and

For residents of this state who are United States citizens but are not in possession of any of the documents or methods of proof enumerated under subparagraphs (A) through (F) of this paragraph, other documents or methods of proof for establishing evidence of United States citizenship which shall be promulgated by rule and regulation of the State Election Board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection, any person who is registered in this state on December 31, 2009, shall be deemed to have provided satisfactory evidence of citizenship and shall not be required to submit evidence of citizenship.

After citizenship has been demonstrated to a board of registrars, an elector shall not be required to resubmit satisfactory evidence of citizenship in that or any other county in this state so long as the person continuously remains an elector of this state.

For the purposes of this subsection, proof of voter registration from another state shall not be satisfactory evidence of citizenship.

After a person has submitted satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the board of registrars shall indicate such information on the elector’s voter registration record. After two years, the board of registrars may destroy all documents that were submitted as evidence of citizenship.

The Secretary of State shall establish procedures to match an applicant’s voter registration information to the information contained in the data base maintained by the Department of Driver Services for the verification of the accuracy of the information provided on the application for voter registration, including whether the applicant has provided satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship.

Prior to approving the application of a person to register to vote, the registrars may check the data bases of persons convicted of felonies and deceased persons maintained by the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-216

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 712, § 1/SB 86; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 6/SB 82; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 7/HB 268; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 5/HB 316.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “a legible copy of” in the first sentence of subparagraph (g)(2)(D); in subparagraph (g)(2)(F), deleted “number” following “card” twice, and substituted “card” for “number” near the end.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, added “on or before the date of the primary or election in which such person seeks to vote” at the end of paragraph (a)(3) and substituted “unless such person shall be at least 18 years of age on or before the date of the primary or election in which such person seeks to vote” for “until the acquisition of all specified qualifications” at the end of subsection (c).

Cross references.

Prohibition against denial of right to vote for failure to pay poll tax or other tax, U.S. Const., amend. 24.

Right to register and vote, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. II.

Disqualification from registering or voting, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. III.

Informing students 18 years and over regarding right to register and vote, §

20-2-310

.

Penalty for voting by unqualified elector, §

21-2-571

.

Penalty for poll officer who allows unqualified person to vote, §

21-2-590

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Verification of United States citizenship of applicants for voter registration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.06.

21-2-217.
Rules for determining residence.

In determining the residence of a person desiring to register to vote or to qualify to run for elective office, the following rules shall be followed so far as they are applicable:

The residence of any person shall be held to be in that place in which such person’s habitation is fixed, without any present intention of removing therefrom;

A person shall not be considered to have lost such person’s residence who leaves such person’s home and goes into another state or county or municipality in this state, for temporary purposes only, with the intention of returning, unless such person shall register to vote or perform other acts indicating a desire to change such person’s citizenship and residence;

A person shall not be considered to have gained a residence in any county or municipality of this state into which such person has come for temporary purposes only without the intention of making such county or municipality such person’s permanent place of abode;

If a person removes to another state with the intention of making it such person’s residence, such person shall be considered to have lost such person’s residence in this state;

(4.1)

If a person removes to another county or municipality in this state with the intention of making it such person’s residence, such person shall be considered to have lost such person’s residence in the former county or municipality in this state;

If a person removes to another state with the intention of remaining there an indefinite time and making such state such person’s place of residence, such person shall be considered to have lost such person’s residence in this state, notwithstanding that such person may intend to return at some indefinite future period;

If a person removes to another county or municipality within this state with the intention of remaining there an indefinite time and making such other county or municipality such person’s place of residence, such person shall be considered to have lost such person’s residence in the former county or municipality, notwithstanding that such person may intend to return at some indefinite future period;

The residence for voting purposes of a person shall not be required to be the same as the residence for voting purposes of his or her spouse;

No person shall be deemed to have gained or lost a residence by reason of such person’s presence or absence while enrolled as a student at any college, university, or other institution of learning in this state;

The mere intention to acquire a new residence, without the fact of removal, shall avail nothing; neither shall the fact of removal without the intention;

No member of the armed forces of the United States shall be deemed to have acquired a residence in this state by reason of being stationed on duty in this state;

If a person removes to the District of Columbia or other federal territory, another state, or foreign country to engage in government service, such person shall not be considered to have lost such person’s residence in this state during the period of such service; and the place where the person resided at the time of such person’s removal shall be considered and held to be such person’s place of residence;

If a person is adjudged mentally ill and is committed to an institution for the mentally ill, such person shall not be considered to have gained a residence in the county in which the institution to which such person is committed is located;

If a person goes into another state and while there exercises the right of a citizen by voting, such person shall be considered to have lost such person’s residence in this state;

The specific address in the county or municipality in which a person has declared a homestead exemption, if a homestead exemption has been claimed, shall be deemed the person’s residence address; and

For voter registration purposes, the board of registrars and, for candidacy residency purposes, the Secretary of State, election superintendent, or hearing officer may consider evidence of where the person receives significant mail such as personal bills and any other evidence that indicates where the person resides.

In determining a voter’s qualification to register and vote, the registrars to whom such application is made shall consider, in addition to the applicant’s expressed intent, any relevant circumstances determining the applicant’s residence. The registrars taking such registration may consider the applicant’s financial independence, business pursuits, employment, income sources, residence for income tax purposes, age, marital status, residence of parents, spouse, and children, if any, leaseholds, sites of personal and real property owned by the applicant, motor vehicle and other personal property registration, and other such factors that the registrars may reasonably deem necessary to determine the qualification of an applicant to vote in a primary or election. The decision of the registrars to whom such application is made shall be presumptive evidence of a person’s residence for voting purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-217

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 16.

Cross references.

Right of nonresident to vote, §

1-2-9

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia’s Administrative Law,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012).

21-2-218.
Cancellation of registration in former state or county; address changes and corrections.

Any person, who is registered to vote in another state and who moves such person’s residence from that state to this state, shall, at the time of making application to register to vote in this state, provide such information as specified by the Secretary of State in order to notify such person’s former voting jurisdiction of the person’s application to register to vote in this state and to cancel such person’s registration in the former place of residence.

Any person, who is registered to vote in another county or municipality in this state and who moves such person’s residence from that county or municipality to another county or municipality in this state, shall, at the time of making application to register to vote in that county or municipality, provide such information as specified by the Secretary of State in order to notify such person’s former voting jurisdiction of the person’s application to register to vote in the new place of residence and to cancel such person’s registration in the former place of residence.

In the event that an elector moves to a residence within the county or municipality and has a different address from the address contained on the person’s registration card, it shall be the duty of such elector to notify the board of registrars of such fact by the fifth Monday prior to the primary or election in which such elector wishes to vote by submitting the change of address in writing. The board of registrars shall then correct the elector’s record to reflect the change of address and place the elector in the proper precinct and voting districts. The board of registrars may accept a properly submitted application for an absentee ballot for this purpose for electors who move to an address within the county or municipality which is different from the address contained on the person’s registration card. The board of registrars may also accept a properly submitted application for an absentee ballot to correct an elector’s name on the voter registration list if all necessary information to complete such a change is included with the application.

In the event that an elector moves to a residence within the county or municipality but into a different precinct or who moves to a residence in the same precinct but at a different address and fails to notify the board of registrars of such fact by the fifth Monday prior to an election or primary such elector shall vote in the precinct of such elector’s former residence for such election or primary and for any runoffs resulting therefrom. The superintendent of an election shall make available at each polling place forms furnished by the Secretary of State which shall be completed by each such elector to reflect such elector’s present legal residence. Such forms may also be used to notify the board of registrars of a change in an elector’s name. The board of registrars shall thereafter place the elector in the proper precinct and voting districts and correct the list of electors accordingly. If the elector is placed in a precinct other than the one in which such elector has previously been voting, such elector shall be notified of the new polling place by first-class mail.

Any provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, an elector who moves from one county or municipality to another after the fifth Monday prior to a primary or election may vote in the county or municipality or precinct in which such elector is registered to vote.

No person shall vote in any county or municipality other than the county or municipality of such person’s residence except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section.

In the event that the registration records incorrectly indicate that an elector has moved from an address within a precinct, the elector may vote in the precinct upon affirming in writing on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State that the elector still resides in the precinct at the address previously provided to the board of registrars. The registrars shall correct the elector’s registration record to reflect the correct address.

If a voter registration application is completed at a polling place for the purpose of recording a change of address and the new address is outside the county, then the registrar shall forward the application to the registrar in the new county of residence.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-218

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 7; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 13/SB 92.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for voter registration by registrars and deputy registrars, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.03.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

Use of absentee ballots when voting machines are inaccessible, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.10.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-219.
Registration cards; form; registration by members of armed forces or merchant marine and permanent overseas citizen; Secretary of State to provide information regarding registration and absentee ballot procedures; reports regarding absentee ballots.

The registration cards for use by persons in making application to register to vote shall be in a form as specified by the Secretary of State, which shall include printed forms, forms made available through electronic means, or otherwise. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and Code Section 21-2-221.2, only registration cards issued or authorized for use by the Secretary of State or the national voter registration card promulgated under the provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973gg-7, shall be accepted for purposes of voter registration.

A person who is a legal resident of this state and a citizen of the United States; who is a member of the armed forces of the United States or the merchant marine, is a spouse or dependent of a member of the armed forces or the merchant marine residing with or accompanying said member, or is temporarily or permanently residing overseas; and who will be absent from such person’s county of residence until after the time for registering for an ensuing primary or election may make proper application for voter registration on the official post card or write-in absentee ballot provided for by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended.

Permanent overseas citizens shall only be authorized to vote for presidential electors and United States senator or representative in Congress. Permanent overseas citizens shall be deemed to be residents of the precinct in which the county courthouse is located.

A properly executed registration card submitted under the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be considered to be an application for an absentee ballot under Code Section 21-2-381 or a special absentee ballot under Code Section 21-2-381.1, as appropriate.

A person who is a United States citizen, permanently residing overseas, who has never lived in the United States, may register and vote in this state in the county of residence of either of such person’s parents under the limitations of subsection (c) of this Code section if either of the person’s parents is registered to vote in this state. Such person shall be deemed to reside at the same location as the parent for voting purposes.

The office of the Secretary of State is designated as the office, under the federal Help America Vote Act, to be responsible for providing information on registration and absentee ballot procedures for use by absent uniformed services and overseas voters, including the use of the federal write-in absentee ballot.

The registrars of each county shall report to the Secretary of State within 60 days after a general election in which federal candidates were on the ballot the combined number of absentee ballots transmitted to absent uniformed services and overseas voters in such election and the combined number of such ballots that were returned by such voters and cast in such election.

The Secretary of State shall within 90 days after a general election in which federal candidates were on the ballot report to the federal Election Assistance Commission, on such form as may be prescribed by such commission, the combined number of absentee ballots transmitted to absent uniformed services and overseas voters in such election and the combined number of such ballots that were returned by such voters and cast in such election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-219

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 15; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 17; Ga. L. 2010, p. 569, § 1/HB 1073; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 8/HB 540; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 14/SB 92.

U.S. Code.

The Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 15301

et seq.

21-2-220.
Application for registration; identification requirement; rejection for failure to provide required information or for submission of false information; aid to disabled or illiterate.

Any person desiring to register as an elector shall apply to do so by making application to a registrar or deputy registrar of such person’s county of residence in person, by submission of the federal post card application form as authorized under Code Section 21-2-219, by making application through the Department of Driver Services as provided in Code Section 21-2-221, by making application through the Department of Natural Resources as provided in Code Section 21-2-221.1, by making application online as provided in Code Section 21-2-221.2, by making application through designated offices as provided in Code Section 21-2-222, or by making application by mail as provided in Code Section 21-2-223.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, whenever a person makes application to register in person or through the means specified in this Code section, the person authorized to offer registration shall inquire as to whether the individual seeking registration is a citizen of the United States, and the person offering registration shall not be required to offer registration to an individual who answers such inquiry with a negative response.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, electors who register to vote for the first time in this state by mail must present current and valid identification either when registering to vote by mail or when voting for the first time after registering to vote by mail. The current and valid identification shall be one or more of those forms of identification provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417 or a legible copy thereof. The registrars shall make copies of any original forms of identification submitted by applicants and return the originals to the applicants. The requirement to submit identification shall not apply to:

Persons who submit identifying information with their applications that the registrars are able to match to information contained on a state data base available to such registrars containing the same number, name, and date of birth as contained in the application;

Persons who are entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq.; or

Persons who are entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.

If an applicant fails to provide all of the required information on the application for voter registration with the exception of current and valid identification, the board of registrars shall notify the registrant in writing of the missing information. The board of registrars shall not determine the eligibility of the applicant until and unless all required information is supplied by the applicant. If the initial application is received prior to the close of voter registration prior to an election, if the applicant supplies the necessary information on or prior to the date of the election, and if the applicant is found eligible to vote, the applicant shall be added to the list of electors and shall be permitted to vote in the election and any run-off elections resulting therefrom and subsequent elections; provided, however, that voters who registered to vote for the first time in this state by mail must supply current and valid identification when voting for the first time as required in subsection (c) of this Code section. In the event the elector does not respond to the request for the missing information within 30 days, the application shall be rejected.

If an applicant submits false information, the board of registrars shall reject the application and shall refer the application to the district attorney of the county for criminal prosecution. If the false information is not discovered until after the applicant’s application has been approved and the applicant’s name added to the list of electors, the giving of such false information shall be cause to challenge the applicant’s right to remain on the list of electors, which, if sustained, shall result in such applicant’s name being removed from the list and the application being submitted to the district attorney of the county for criminal prosecution.

A person registering to vote who is disabled or illiterate may request assistance from any other person in completing the form for registration, but the person offering assistance shall sign the voter registration form in the space provided to identify the person offering assistance.

The registrars shall note on their records and the electors list any elector who registers by mail for the first time in this state and does not provide the identification required by subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 5, 29; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 16; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 18; Ga. L. 2004, p. 732, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 24/HB 244; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 10-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 15/SB 92.

Cross references.

Handicapped persons, T. 30.

21-2-220.1.
Required documentation for voter registration.

Any person applying to register to vote shall provide his or her Georgia driver’s license number or identification card number for an identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40 on the voter registration application. If a person does not have a Georgia driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, such person shall provide the last four digits of his or her social security number on the voter registration application. If a person does not have a Georgia driver’s license, a Georgia identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, or a social security number, the person shall affirm this fact in the manner prescribed in the voter registration application upon penalty of law and such application shall be processed without regard to the procedures outlined in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Code section.

In the event that the name, driver’s license number, social security number, or date of birth provided by the person registering to vote on the voter registration form does not match information about the applicant on file at the Department of Driver Services or the federal Social Security Administration, the applicant shall nevertheless be registered to vote but shall be required to produce proof of his or her identity to a county registrar, a deputy county registrar, a poll manager, or a poll worker at or before the time that such applicant requests a ballot for the first time in any federal, state, or local election.

Proof of the applicant’s identity as set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be the forms of identification listed in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-220.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 8/HB 268; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 6/HB 316.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “For those voter registration applicants who have a Georgia driver’s license number or identification card number for an identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, or the last four digits of a social security number, a voter registration application may be accepted as valid only after the board of registrars has verified the authenticity of the Georgia driver’s license number, the identification card number of an identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, or the last four digits of the social security number provided by the applicant.”; rewrote subsection (c); and deleted subsection (d), which read: “(1) If a completed voter registration application has been received by the registration deadline set by Code Section 21-2-224 but the Georgia driver’s license number, the identification card number of an identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, or the last four digits of the social security number provided by the applicant cannot be verified, the applicant shall be notified that the number cannot be verified and that the applicant must provide sufficient evidence to the board of registrars to verify the applicant’s identity in order to have his or her application processed by the board of registrars.

“(2) If the applicant provides such sufficient evidence on or before the date of a primary or election, and if the applicant is found eligible to vote, the applicant shall be added to the list of electors and shall be permitted to vote in the primary or election and any runoff resulting therefrom and subsequent primaries and elections.

“(3) If the applicant has not provided such sufficient evidence or such number has not otherwise been verified on or before the date of a primary or election, the applicant presenting himself or herself to vote shall be provided a provisional ballot. The provisional ballot shall be counted only if such number is verified by the end of the time period set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-419 or if the applicant presents sufficient evidence to the board of registrars to verify the applicant’s identity, by the end of the time period set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-419.

“(4) The voter application shall be rejected if the Georgia driver’s license number, identification card number of an identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, or last four digits of the social security number provided by the applicant is not verified and the applicant fails to present sufficient evidence to the board of registrars to verify the applicant’s identity within 26 months following the date of the application.

“(5) This subsection shall not apply to an electronic voter registration application submitted pursuant to Code Section 21-2-221.2.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-221.
Driver’s license or identification card application as application for voter registration; forms and procedure; electronic transmission of applications and signatures.

Each application to obtain, renew, or change the name or address on a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Driver Services pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 40 made by an applicant who is within six months of such applicant’s eighteenth birthday or older shall also serve as an application for voter registration unless the applicant declines to register to vote through specific declination or by failing to sign the voter registration application.

The commissioner of driver services and the Secretary of State shall agree upon and design such procedures and forms as will be necessary to comply with this Code section.

The forms designed by the commissioner of driver services and the Secretary of State:

Shall not require the applicant to duplicate any information required in the driver’s license portion of the application with the exception of a second signature;

Shall include such information as required on other voter registration cards issued by the Secretary of State;

Shall contain a statement that states each eligibility requirement contained in Code Section 21-2-216, that contains an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement, and that requires the signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury; and

Shall include, in print that is identical to that used in the attestation, the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application; and a statement that, if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

Any change of address submitted to the Department of Driver Services for the purpose of changing the information contained on a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Driver Services shall serve as a notification of change of address for voter registration unless the registrant states that at the time of submitting the change of address that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes.

The Department of Driver Services shall transmit the completed applications for voter registration to the Secretary of State at the conclusion of each business day. The Secretary of State shall forward the applications to the appropriate county board of registrars to determine the eligibility of the applicant and, if found eligible, to add the applicant’s name to the list of electors and to place the applicant in the correct precinct and voting districts.

The Department of Driver Services shall maintain such statistical records on the number of registrations and declinations as requested by the Secretary of State.

No information relating to the failure of an applicant for a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Driver Services to sign a voter registration application may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.

The Secretary of State and the commissioner of driver services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the transmission of voter registration applications and signatures electronically. Such electronically transmitted signatures shall be valid as signatures on the voter registration application and shall be treated in all respects as a manually written original signature and shall be recognized as such in any matter concerning the voter registration application.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 10-2/HB 501.